Hawaii statutes.
§209-5 Duties of coordinator. The
rehabilitation coordinator shall:

(1) Provide for the official contact between the
State and persons affected by the state disaster;

(2) Make available to persons affected by the state
disaster information on all state rehabilitation programs;

(3) Aid all persons affected by the state disaster in
securing assistance available under this chapter;

(4) Inform persons affected by the state disaster of
assistance available from sources other than the State, and assist the victims
in obtaining any assistance;

(5) Keep lists of persons affected by the state
disaster, all assistance received by the victims from the State and, to the
extent that the information is available, assistance from other sources;

(6) Advise the governor as to the administration and
effectiveness of the various programs;

(7) Establish a temporary office on the island
affected by the state disaster if necessary, and where more than one island is
affected, establish such offices as the governor may direct; and

(8) File an annual report with the governor and the
legislature describing the organization, activities, expenditures, and
assistance granted pursuant to this chapter and making recommendations to
increase the effectiveness of this chapter at least twenty days before the
convening of the regular session of the legislature. [L 1961, c 189, §6; Supp,
§98P-6; HRS §209-5; am L 1976, c 205, §1(1); am L 1979, c 105, §20; am L 1993,
c 333, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next